Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-63] Duties of trial counsel and
defense counsel. (a) The trial counsel of a general or special
court-martial shall prosecute in the name of the State, and shall, under the
direction of the court, prepare the record of the proceedings.

(b) The accused has the right to be
represented in the accused's defense before a general or special court-martial
by civilian counsel if provided by the accused, or by military counsel of the
accused's own selection if reasonably available, or by the defense counsel
detailed under section 124A-46. Should the accused have counsel of the
accused's own selection, the defense counsel, and assistant defense counsel, if
any, who were detailed, shall, if the accused so desires, act as the accused's
associate counsel; otherwise they shall be excused by the president of the
court.

(c) In every court-martial proceeding, the
defense counsel may, in the event of conviction, forward for attachment to the
record of proceedings a brief of such matters the defense counsel feels should
be considered in behalf of the accused on review, including any objection to
the contents of the record which the defense counsel considers appropriate.

(d) An assistant trial counsel of a general
court-martial may, under the direction of the trial counsel or when the
assistant trial counsel is qualified to be a trial counsel as required by
section 124A-46, perform any duty imposed by law, rule, or the custom of the
service upon the trial counsel of the court. An assistant trial counsel of a
special court-martial may perform any duty of the trial counsel.

(e) An assistant defense counsel of a general
or special court-martial may, under the direction of the defense counsel or
when the assistant defense counsel is qualified to be the defense counsel as
required by section 124A-46, perform any duty imposed by law, rule, or the
custom of the service upon counsel for the accused. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next